Maryland, session 2026, HB0846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(cc) “Property” means real property and personal property.
(dd) “Property tax” means the property tax imposed by:
(1) the State;
(2) a county; or
– 1 –

Ch. 810 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) a municipal corporation.
7–251.
(A) Property is not subject to property tax if the property:
(1) is owned by [The]:
(I) THE CITY OF HAGERSTOWN; OR
(II) THE Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility, Inc.;
and
(2) is used primarily for public social, recreational, and entertainment
purposes.
(B) (1) THE EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
APPLY RETROACTIVELY TO TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER JUNE 30, 2023.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL GRANT AN EXEMPTION FOR ALL
ELIGIBLE TAXABLE YEARS TO A PERSON THAT REQUESTS A RETROACTIVE
EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE STATE, WASHINGTON COUNTY, AND THE CITY OF
HAGERSTOWN SHALL PAY A REFUND FOR ANY EXCESS PROPERTY TAX PAID DUE TO
A RETROACTIVE EXEMPTION GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–524.
Notwithstanding the exemption from property tax under § 7–251 of this title, [The]
THE Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility, Inc. may pay to the governing body
of Washington County or the City of Hagerstown an amount, if any, that may be set by
mutual agreement in lieu of the taxes that would otherwise be due on all or part of the
facility.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –